Arkansas, session 2025, HB1828.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-401, concerning sales tax exemptions,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(45) Gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from sales of
tangible personal property, specified digital products, a digital code, or a
service to Inspiration Point Center for the Arts, Inc.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.








*JLL080*
03/17/2025 3:32:22 PM JLL080